Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1803] Duties of the student
conference committee. It shall be the duty of the student conference
committee, under the guidance of the student conference advisory committee, to:

(1) Plan and coordinate all phases of the annual
conference of secondary school students;

(2) Set the theme, scope, and format of the
conference;

(3) Set the agenda of the conference;

(4) Determine the number of participants;

(5) Plan and provide for food, lodging, and the
transportation of all participants;

(6) Evaluate the worth and effectiveness of the
conference; and

(7) Consider and act on any other matter relevant to
or necessary to effectuate the purpose of this part. [L 2013, c 156, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next